Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.580

[Art. 71] Restoration.

(1) Under such regulations as the governor may prescribe, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and such executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon a new trial or rehearing.

(2) If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of his or her enlistment.

(3) If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue, and the commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed by the governor alone to such commissioned grade and with such rank as in the opinion of the governor that former officer would have attained had he or she not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer may be made if a position vacancy is available under applicable tables of organization. All time between the dismissal and reappointment shall be considered as service for all purposes.

[ 2011 c 336 s 773; 1989 c 48 s 60; 1963 c 220 s 73.]